Utah statutes.
31A-37-403.   Participants in sponsored captive insurance companies.

(1)  Any of the following may be a participant in a sponsored captive insurance company holding a certificate of authority under this chapter:

(a)  an association;

(b)  a corporation;

(c)  a limited liability company;

(d)  a partnership;

(e)  a trust; or

(f)  any other business entity.

(2)  A sponsor may be a participant in a sponsored captive insurance company.

(3)  A participant need not be:

(a)  a shareholder of the sponsored captive insurance company; or

(b)  an affiliate of the sponsored captive insurance company.

(4)  A participant shall insure only the participant's own risks through a sponsored captive insurance company unless otherwise approved by the commissioner.

